Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 8. Reciprocal Fishing Agreements

§ 23-1-801.
Reciprocal fishing agreements with adjoining states authorized; stamps for licenses.

The commission is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with corresponding state officials of adjoining states for purposes of providing for the licensing for fishing of residents of this state and adjoining states upon artificial impoundments of water forming the boundary between this state and adjoining states. The agreements may include provisions by which each state shall honor the license of the other only when the licensee has purchased a stamp or authorization signifying purchase of a stamp from the other state, the charge for the stamp being set by mutual agreement of the states.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-108.1; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-28; Laws 2006, ch. 9, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “the licensee has purchased a stamp or authorization signifying purchase of a stamp” for “there is affixed to the license a stamp.”

Laws 2006, ch. 9, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2006.

§ 23-1-802.
Reciprocal fishing agreements with adjoining states authorized; authorizing use of equipment otherwise prohibited.

Notwithstanding any other law of Wyoming, in order to effect conformity with the laws and regulations of an adjoining state which is a party to such an agreement, the commission may, by order, authorize the use of fishing devices and equipment, otherwise prohibited by Wyoming law, in water forming the subject of any agreement.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 120, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 23-108.2; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-29.

§ 23-1-803.
Reciprocal fishing agreements with adjoining states authorized; water subject to agreements.

It is the primary purpose of this article to provide a method whereby the fishing opportunities afforded by lakes or reservoirs located upon the boundaries of this state and adjoining states may be mutually enjoyed by the residents of Wyoming and the residents of adjoining states.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 120, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 23-108.3; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-30.

§ 23-1-804.
Reciprocal fishing agreements with adjoining states authorized; implementing orders.

The commission is authorized to establish orders as provided in this act to implement any agreements under this article.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-31.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§

23-1-102

(a)(xiii).